Georgia, session 2025_26, HB518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Sexual Assault Reform Act of 2025."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 5 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to searches and
seizures, is amended by revising Code Section 17-5-74, relating to unreported sexual assault
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 56 0352S
kits, definitions, state-wide tracking system, requirements, implementation, reporting,
jurisdiction, liability, and regulatory authority, as follows:
"17-5-74.
(a) For the purposes of As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Over-the-counter sexual assault evidence kit' means a sexual assault forensic exam
kit or rape kit that:
(A) Is marketed or presented as a do-it-yourself, over-the-counter, at-home, or
self-collected early evidence kit;
(B) Is offered for sale or as a sample to members of the public; and
(C) Purports to allow an individual to independently collect evidence of a sexual
assault outside of a collecting facility.
(2) 'Unreported' 'unreported' sexual assault kit' means a sexual assault kit collected from
a victim who has consented to the collection of the sexual assault kit but who has not
reported the alleged crime to law enforcement.
(b) The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall create and operate a state-wide sexual
assault kit tracking system. The council may contract with state or nonstate entities
including, but not limited to, private software and technology providers, for the creation,
operation, and maintenance of the system.
(c) The state-wide sexual assault kit tracking system shall:
(1) Track the location and status of sexual assault kits throughout the criminal justice
process, including the initial collection in sexual assault forensic examinations performed
at medical facilities, receipt and storage at law enforcement agencies, receipt and analysis
at forensic laboratories, and storage and any destruction after completion of analysis;
(2) Designate sexual assault kits as an unreported sexual assault kit or as a reported
sexual assault kit;
(3) Allow medical facilities performing sexual assault forensic examinations, law
enforcement agencies, prosecutors, the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 56 0352S
Bureau of Investigation, and other entities having custody of sexual assault kits to update
and track the status and location of sexual assault kits;
(4) Allow victims of sexual assault to anonymously track or receive updates regarding
the status of their sexual assault kits; and
(5) Use electronic technology or technologies allowing continuous access.
(d) The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council may use a phased implementation process
in order to launch the sexual assault kit tracking system and facilitate entry and use of the
system for required participants. The council may phase initial participation according to
region, volume, or other appropriate classifications. All law enforcement agencies and
other entities having custody of sexual assault kits shall register for and utilize the system
in order to fully participate no later than July 1, 2022. The council shall submit a report on
the current status and plan for launching the system, including the plan for phased
implementation, to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the Governor no later
than January 1, 2022.
(e) The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall submit a report on the state-wide
sexual assault kit tracking system to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
Governor. The council shall publish the current report on its website. The first report shall
be submitted on or before December 31, 2022, and subsequent reports are to be submitted
on or before December 31 of each year. Each report shall include the following:
(1) The number of sexual assault kits used by collection sites to conduct forensic medical
examinations of assault victims;
(2) Of the sexual assault kits used by collection sites to conduct forensic medical
examinations, the number of sexual assault kits for which a sexual assault has been
reported to law enforcement, sorted by law enforcement agency;
(3) The average time for each law enforcement agency to collect reported sexual assault
kits from collection sites;
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 56 0352S
(4) Of the sexual assault kits generated for reported cases, the number of sexual assault
kits submitted to a laboratory for forensic testing;
(5) Of the sexual assault kits submitted for forensic testing, the number of kits for which
forensic testing has been completed;
(6) The number of sexual assault kits for which a sexual assault has not been reported
to law enforcement; and
(7) The jurisdictions in which reported sexual assault kits have not been submitted to the
Division of Forensic Services Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation in
accordance with Code Section 35-1-2.
(f) For the purpose of reports submitted under subsection (e) of this Code section, a sexual
assault kit shall be assigned to the jurisdiction associated with the law enforcement agency
anticipated to receive the sexual assault kit or otherwise having custody of the sexual
assault kit.
(g) Any public agency or entity, including its officials and employees, and any hospital
and its employees providing services to victims of sexual assault shall not be held civilly
liable for damages arising from any release of information or the failure to release
information related to the state-wide sexual assault kit tracking system, so long as the
release was without gross negligence.
(h) The Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall adopt rules as necessary to implement
this Code section.
(i) An over-the-counter sexual assault evidence kit does not include a sexual assault kit
sold or provided to law enforcement or medical personnel or a collecting facility. A person
may not sell, offer for sale, or provide to an individual an over-the-counter sexual assault
evidence kit. A violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by fine not to
exceed $1,000.00."
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 56 0352S
SECTION 3.
Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to law enforcement officers and
agencies, is amended by revising subsections (c), (e), (f), and (g) of Code Section 35-1-2,
relating to examination of sexual assault victims and reports, as follows:
"(c) It shall be the duty of every law enforcement officer who takes possession of the
evidence as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section to ensure that such evidence is
submitted to the division for testing within 30 days of it being collected, in accordance with
100 the procedures established by the division. The division shall test evidence received in
101 compliance with this section, unless the victim requests in writing directly to the division
102 that the evidence not be tested."
103 "(e) It shall be the duty of every law enforcement agency to create a list of evidence
104 resulting from a forensic medical examination that is in such agency's possession on
105 August 1, 2016, identifying such evidence as needing to be tested and submitting such
106 listing of information to the division by August 15, 2016.
107 (f)(e) A failure to comply with the provisions of this Code section shall not affect the
108 admissibility of evidence collected from a forensic medical examination.
109 (g)(f) Beginning December 1, 2016, the division shall issue an annual report detailing the
110 number of cases for which it has tested evidence pursuant to this Code section and the
111 number of cases that are awaiting testing. Such report shall be provided to the executive
112 counsel of the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Lieutenant
113 Governor President of the Senate, the members of the House Committee on Judiciary,
114 Non-civil,; the members of the Senate Judiciary Committee,; the House Committee on
115 Public and Community Health; and Human Services, and the Senate Health and Human
116 Services Committee; and posted online at the Georgia Bureau of Investigation's public
117 website."
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 5 -

LC 56 0352S
118 SECTION 4.
119 Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
120 "35-6A-18.
121 (a) There is created the Forensic Medical Examination Advisory Committee which shall
122 be composed of 13 members.
123 (b) The members of the committee shall be the State Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner
124 (SANE) Coordinator and 12 other citizens of this state appointed by the Governor. Of the
125 members appointed by the Governor, four shall be registered nurses who hold certification
126 in forensic nursing, one shall be a representative from the Georgia Board of Nursing, one
127 shall be a representative from the Georgia Nurses Association, two shall be licensed
128 providers under Georgia law who are advanced practitioners, one shall be a peace officer
129 certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, one shall be a
130 prosecuting attorney, one shall be employed by the Division of Forensic Sciences of the
131 Georgia Bureau of Investigation, and one shall be a victims' rights advocate. The Governor
132 shall make the initial appointments not later than July 1, 2025, and shall appoint three
133 members for a one-year term of office, three members for two-year terms of office, three
134 members for three-year terms of office, and three members for four-year terms of office,
135 which shall be specified in each member's appointment. Thereafter, successors shall be
136 appointed to four-year terms of office. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the
137 Governor for the unexpired term. Initial terms of office shall begin on July 1, 2025.
138 (c) The committee shall establish by rule and regulation criteria for the SANE didactic and
139 clinical training protocols for the forensic medical examination and maintain certificates
140 for forensic nurses in the state. The training protocols shall be consistent with best practice
141 as defined by the national organizations and uphold nurse practice standards as regulated
142 by the Georgia Board of Nursing. To receive the state certificate, the registered nurse must
143 complete a Criminal Justice Coordinating Council approved SANE didactic and clinical
144 training and submit the required documents required by the protocol as set forth by the
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 6 -

LC 56 0352S
145 committee. Forensic nurses with sexual assault nurse training who begin practice in this
146 state on or after August 1, 2025, shall have until January 1, 2026, to apply for the state
147 certificate. Nurses entering the state on or after August 1, 2025, and who intend to practice
148 as a sexual assault nurse examiner shall apply for the state certificate prior to beginning
149 practice as a sexual assault nurse examiner. The Victims Compensation Division of the
150 Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall have the authority to make exceptions for any
151 reimbursement for the SANE examination by rule or regulation.
152 (d) On and after October 1, 2025, persons or organizations that provide sexual assault
153 nurse examiner training in this state shall register and receive approval from the Forensic
154 Medical Examination Advisory Committee prior to offering such training. Such persons
155 or organizations shall submit the locations and dates of the proposed training and the
156 training content for all adult/adolescent and pediatric didactic and clinical training for
157 approval by the Forensic Medical Examination Advisory Committee. Such persons or
158 organizations shall report to the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council on completed
159 training with such information and in such manner as directed by the Criminal Justice
160 Coordinating Council.
161 (e) Approvals for trainings made by the Forensic Medical Examination Advisory
162 Committee and the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall adhere to the established
163 rules as set forth by the committee protocol. The committee shall also act as an advisory
164 committee to assist the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council in developing best practice
165 recommendations for forensic medical examiners in this state."
166 SECTION 5.
167 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 518 (SUB)
- 7 -